Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2524YH (3) 91 jm/md H.F. 407 Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. For school years beginning on or after 3 July 1, 2026, for each pupil participating in open enrollment, 4 the board of directors of the district of residence shall also 5 pay to the receiving district from the total amount received 6 under section 423F.2 an amount equal to the per pupil amount 7 distributed to the district of residence from the secure an 8 advanced vision for education fund under section 423F.2, 9 subsection 3, for the previous school year. Moneys received 10 by the receiving district under this paragraph shall be used 11 solely for the purposes authorized under chapter 423F. 12